Connecticut, session 2026, HB05279.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsection (a) of section 31-294k of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "COVID-19" means the respiratory disease designated by the
World Health Organization on February 11, 2020, as coronavirus 2019,
and any related mutation thereof recognized by the World Health
Organization as a communicable respiratory disease;
(2) "Eligible individual" means a police officer, firefighter, emergency
medical services personnel, Department of Correction employee,
telecommunicator or health care provider, and on and after January 1,
HB5279 / File No. 237 1

HB5279 File No. 237
2024, an employee;
(3) "Emergency medical services personnel" has the same meaning as
provided in section 20-206jj;
(4) "Employee" has the same meaning as provided in section 31-275;
(5) "Firefighter" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-313g;
(6) "Health care provider" means (A) a person employed at a doctor's
office, hospital, health care center, clinic, medical school, local health
department or agency, nursing facility, retirement facility, nursing
home, group home, home health care provider, any facility that
performs laboratory or medical testing, pharmacy or any similar
institution, or (B) a person employed to provide personal care
assistance, as defined in section 17b-706, in or about a private dwelling,
provided such person is regularly employed by the owner or occupier
of the dwelling for more than twenty-six hours per week;
(7) "In the line of duty" means any action that an eligible individual
is obligated or authorized by law, rule, regulation or written condition
of employment service to perform, or for which the eligible individual
is compensated by the public entity such individual serves, except that,
in the case of a volunteer firefighter, such action or service constitutes
fire duties, as defined in subsection (b) of section 7-314b;
(8) "Mental health professional" means a board-certified psychiatrist
or a psychologist licensed pursuant to chapter 383, who has experience
diagnosing and treating post-traumatic stress injury;
(9) "Parole officer" means an employee of the Department of
Correction who supervises inmates in the community after their release
from prison on parole or under another prison release program;
(10) "Police officer" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-
294a, except that "police officer" does not include an officer of a law
enforcement unit of the Mashantucket Pequot Tribe or the Mohegan
Tribe of Indians of Connecticut;
HB5279 / File No. 237 2

HB5279 File No. 237
(11) "Post-traumatic stress injury" means an injury that meets the
diagnostic criteria for post-traumatic stress disorder as specified in the
most recent edition of the American Psychiatric Association's
"Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders";
(12) "Qualifying event" means:
(A) An event occurring in the line of duty on or after July 1, 2019, in
which a police officer, parole officer, firefighter, emergency medical
services personnel, Department of Correction employee or
telecommunicator:
(i) Views a deceased minor;
(ii) Witnesses the death of a person or an incident involving the death
of a person;
(iii) Witnesses an injury to a person who subsequently dies before or
upon admission at a hospital as a result of the injury and not as a result
of any other intervening cause;
(iv) Has physical contact with and treats an injured person who
subsequently dies before or upon admission at a hospital as a result of
the injury and not as a result of any other intervening cause;
(v) Carries an injured person who subsequently dies before or upon
admission at a hospital as a result of the injury and not as a result of any
other intervening cause; [or]
(vi) Witnesses a traumatic physical injury that results in the loss of a
vital body part or a vital body function that results in permanent
disfigurement of the victim; or
(vii) On and after October 1, 2026, witnesses a serious physical injury
to a person that does not result in (I) the death of such person, or (II) the
loss of a vital body part or a vital body function that results in a
permanent disfigurement of such person;
(B) An event arising out of and in the course of employment on or
HB5279 / File No. 237 3

HB5279 File No. 237
after March 10, 2020, in which an eligible individual who is a health care
provider is engaged in activities substantially dedicated to mitigating or
responding to the public health and civil preparedness emergencies
declared by the Governor on March 10, 2020, or any extension of such
emergency declarations; and:
(i) Witnesses the death of a person due to COVID-19 or due to
symptoms that were later diagnosed as COVID-19;
(ii) Witnesses an injury to a person who subsequently dies as a result
of COVID-19 or due to symptoms that were later diagnosed as COVID-
19;
(iii) Has physical contact with and treats or provides care for a person
who subsequently dies as a result of COVID-19 or due to symptoms that
were later diagnosed as COVID-19; or
(iv) Witnesses a traumatic physical injury that results in the loss of a
vital body function of a person due to COVID-19 or due to symptoms
that were later diagnosed as COVID-19; or
(C) An event arising out of and in the course of employment on and
after January 1, 2024, in which an employee:
(i) Views a deceased minor;
(ii) Witnesses the death of a person or an incident involving the death
of a person;
(iii) Witnesses an injury to a person who subsequently dies before or
upon admission at a hospital as a result of the injury and not as a result
of any other intervening cause;
(iv) Has physical contact with and treats an injured person who
subsequently dies before or upon admission at a hospital as a result of
the injury and not as a result of any other intervening cause;
(v) Carries an injured person who subsequently dies before or upon
admission at a hospital as a result of the injury and not as a result of any
HB5279 / File No. 237 4

HB5279 File No. 237
100 other intervening cause; [or]
101 (vi) Witnesses a traumatic physical injury that results in the loss of a
102 vital body part or a vital body function that results in permanent
103 disfigurement of the victim; or
104 (vii) On and after October 1, 2026, witnesses a serious physical injury
105 to a person that does not result in (I) the death of such person, or (II) the
106 loss of a vital body part or a vital body function that results in a
107 permanent disfigurement of such person;
108 (13) "Serious physical injury" has the same meaning as provided in
109 section 53a-3;
110 [(13)] (14) "Telecommunicator" has the same meaning as provided in
111 section 28-30; and
112 [(14)] (15) "Witnesses" means, for an eligible individual who is a
113 telecommunicator, hears by telephone or radio while directly
114 responding to an emergency call that constitutes a qualifying event
115 under this section and providing a dispatch assignment.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 31-294k(a)
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5279 / File No. 237 5

HB5279 File No. 237
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Administrative App Fund - See Below See Below
Services - Workers' Comp. Potential Cost
Claims
Note: App Fund=All Appropriated Funds
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Various Municipalities STATE See Below See Below
MANDATE1
- Potential
Cost
Explanation
The bill results in a potential cost to the Department of
Administrative Services – Worker’s Compensation Claims and various
self-insured municipalities beginning in FY 27 to the extent qualified
personnel apply for workers’ compensation benefits due to the
expanded population eligible for such benefits due to post-traumatic
stress injuries.
Any potential increase in the number of workers' compensation
claims resulting from this bill is not anticipated to be great enough to
State mandate is defined in Sec. 2-32b(2) of the Connecticut General Statutes, "state
mandate" means any state initiated constitutional, statutory or executive action that
requires a local government to establish, expand or modify its activities in such a way
as to necessitate additional expenditures from local revenues.
HB5279 / File No. 237 6

HB5279 File No. 237
result in a fiscal impact to the Workers' Compensation Commission.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
HB5279 / File No. 237 7

HB5279 File No. 237
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5279
AN ACT ADDING WITNESSING A SERIOUS PHYSICAL INJURY AS
A QUALIFYING EVENT FOR PURPOSES OF POST-TRAUMATIC
STRESS INJURY WORKERS' COMPENSATION COVERAGE.